dictsource/ak_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Akan (Ghana)


.group a
        a        a

.group b
        b        b

.group c
        c        k
        c (e     s
        c (i     s

.group d
        d        d
        dw       dZ
        dw (i    dZ;

.group e
        e        e

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
        gy       dz;

.group h
        h        h
        h (i     C
        hw (i    Cw
        hy       C

.group i
        i        i

.group j
        j        dZ

.group k
        k        k
        ky       tS;

.group l
        l        l

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n
        n (k     N
        ng       N:
        ng (i    n^
        nj       n^
        nw       N:w
        nw (i    n^
        ny (i    n^:
        nny (i   n^:

.group o
        o        o

.group p
        p        p

.group ɛ
        ɛ        E

.group q
        q        k
        qu        kw

.group r
        r        R

.group s
        s        s

.group t
        t        t
        t (i     tC

.group u
        u        u

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group ɔ
        ɔ        O

.group x
        x        ks
     _) x        z

.group y
        y        j
     K) y (K     i

.group z
        z        z

.group
        $        dOlaR
